Utah statutes.
63E-1-404.   Penalties for violation.
(1)  A person who knowingly violates this part:
(a)  is guilty of a third degree felony if the combined value of any
compensation or assets received by the person as a result of the violation is
equal to or greater than $10,000; or
(b)  is guilty of a class A misdemeanor if the combined value of any
compensation or assets received by the person as a result of the violation is
less than $10,000.
(2) (a)  In addition to any penalty imposed under Subsection (1), a person
that violates this part shall return to the successor of the independent
entity any compensation or assets received in violation of this part.
(b)  If the assets received by the person in violation of this part are no
longer in the possession of the person, the person shall pay the successor of
the independent entity an amount equal to the fair market value of the asset
at the time the person received the asset.
(3)  Notwithstanding Subsection 36-11-401(3), if a lobbyist violates
Subsection 63E-1-402(2)(b)(i), the lobbyist is guilty of the crime outlined in
Subsection (1), which crime shall be determined by the value of compensation
or assets received by the lobbyist.
